Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202544-1527
Director; investigatory powers; costs.

The director may examine and investigate the affairs of every insurer or health insurance lead generator doing business in this state in order to determine whether such insurer or health insurance lead generator has been, or is, engaged in an unfair trade practice as defined in section 44-1524. A health insurance lead generator and an insurer other than an agent, broker, or insurance consultant shall reimburse the department for the expense of examination in the same manner as provided for examination of insurance companies in the Insurers Examination Act. In the case of a depository institution, the director may examine and investigate the insurance activities of a depository institution in order to determine whether the depository institution has been, or is, engaged in an unfair trade practice. The director shall notify the appropriate state or federal banking agency of the director's intent to examine and investigate a depository institution and advise the appropriate state or federal banking agency of the suspected violation of state law prior to commencing the examination and investigation.

Laws 1973, LB 349, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 75;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB326, § 4.

Insurers Examination Act, see section 44-5901.